Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-453
State committee; review proposal; approve or disapprove; effect.

The State Committee for the Reorganization of School Districts shall, within forty days after receipt of the proposal as provided in section 79-452, review and approve or disapprove the proposal and return to the school districts a statement of its decision. If the state committee disapproves the proposal, no further action shall be taken in regard to it and it shall not be resubmitted in substance for a period of six months from the date it was filed with the state committee.

Laws 1965, c. 510, § 2, p. 1630;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.24;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 202;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 55.